Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
19-1-103.5. Other definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:
Entire section added, p. 82, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 97:
Entire section repealed, p. 1031, § 67, effective August 6.

19-1-104. Jurisdiction.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the juvenile court has exclusive original jurisdiction in proceedings:

Concerning any child committing a delinquent act, as defined in section 19-2.5-102;

Concerning any child who is neglected or dependent, as set forth in section 19-3-102;

To determine the legal custody of any child or to appoint a guardian of the person or legal custodian of any child who comes within the juvenile court's jurisdiction under provisions of this section, and may also enter findings and orders as described
in section 14-10-123 (1.5) and section 15-14-204 (2.5);

To terminate the legal parent-child relationship;

For the issuance of orders of support under article 6 of this title;

To determine the parentage of a child and to make an order of support in connection therewith;

For the adoption of a person of any age;

For judicial consent to the marriage, employment, or enlistment of a child, when such consent is required by law;

For the treatment or commitment pursuant to article 23 of title 17 and part 2 of article 10 of title 25.5 of a child who has a behavioral or mental health disorder or an intellectual and developmental disability and who comes within the court's jurisdiction
under other provisions of this section;

Under the interstate compact on juveniles, part 7 of article 60 of title 24, C.R.S.;

To make a determination concerning a petition filed pursuant to the "School Attendance Law of 1963", article 33 of title 22, C.R.S., and to enforce any lawful order of court made thereunder;

To make a determination concerning a petition for review of need for placement in accordance with the provisions of section 19-1-115 (8);

To decide the appeal of any child found to be in contempt of a municipal court located within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, if confinement of the child is ordered by the municipal court;

Concerning any youth who is voluntarily participating in the foster youth in transition program established in section 19-7-303.

(1.5) A juvenile court exercising jurisdiction pursuant to subsection (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(f), or (1)(g) of this section may enter findings establishing eligibility for classification as a special immigrant juvenile under federal law.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the juvenile court shall have jurisdiction in proceedings concerning any adult who abuses, ill-treats, neglects, or abandons a child who comes within the court's jurisdiction under other provisions of this section.

Upon hearing after prior notice to the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, the court may issue temporary orders providing for legal custody, protection, support, medical evaluation or medical treatment, surgical treatment, psychological evaluation
or psychological treatment, or dental treatment as it deems in the best interest of any child concerning whom a petition has been filed prior to adjudication or disposition of his case.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the court may, on the basis of a report that a child's welfare may be endangered, and if the court believes that a medical evaluation or emergency medical or surgical treatment is
reasonably necessary, issue ex parte emergency orders. Where the need for a medical evaluation or medical or surgical emergency orders arises and the court is not in regular session, the judge or magistrate may give oral
or telephone authorization for the necessary medical evaluation or emergency medical, surgical, or hospital care, which authorization shall have the same force and effect as if written, the same to be followed by a written
order to enter on the first regular court day thereafter. Such written order shall make specific findings of fact that such emergency existed. Prior to the entry of any emergency order, reasonable effort shall be made to
notify the parents, guardian, or other legal custodian for the purpose of gaining consent for such care; except that, if such consent cannot be secured and the child's welfare so requires, the court may authorize needed
medical evaluation or emergency medical, surgical, or hospital care. Such ex parte emergency orders shall expire twenty-four hours after issuance; except that, at any time during such twenty-four-hour period, the parents,
guardian, or other legal custodian may apply for a hearing to set aside the ex parte emergency order.

Nothing in this section shall deprive the district court of jurisdiction to appoint a guardian for a child nor of jurisdiction to determine the legal custody of a child upon writ of habeas corpus or when the question of legal custody is incidental to
the determination of a cause in the district court; except that:

If a petition involving the same child is pending in juvenile court or if continuing jurisdiction has been previously acquired by the juvenile court, the district court shall certify the question of legal custody to the juvenile court; and

The district court at any time may request the juvenile court to make recommendations pertaining to guardianship or legal custody.

Where a custody award or an order allocating parental responsibilities with respect to a child has been made in a district court in a dissolution of marriage action or another proceeding and the jurisdiction of the district court in the case is continuing,
the juvenile court may take jurisdiction in a case involving the same child if the child comes within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court. The juvenile court shall provide notice in compliance with the Colorado rules of civil
procedure; except that service must be effected not less than seven business days prior to the hearing. The notice must be written in clear language stating that the hearing concerns the allocation of parental responsibilities.
When creating or modifying an existing order, the juvenile court shall proceed as set forth in subsection (6) of this section for a dependency and neglect proceeding pursuant to article 3 of this title 19, or as set forth in subsection
(8) of this section for a juvenile delinquency case pursuant to article 2.5 of this title 19.

When the juvenile court maintains jurisdiction in a case involving a child who is dependent or neglected and no child custody action or action for the allocation of parental responsibilities concerning the same child is pending in a district court in
this state, upon the petition of a party to the dependency or neglect case, the juvenile court may enter an order allocating parental responsibilities and addressing parenting time and child support matters. The parent or person
other than a parent with whom the child resides the majority of the time pursuant to the juvenile court's order shall file a certified copy of the order in the district court in the county where the child is permanently resident.
Such order shall be treated in the district court as any other decree issued in a proceeding concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities.

Upon motion of the city or county attorney, guardian ad litem, counsel for youth, or respondent parent counsel, the district or the juvenile court has jurisdiction to enter a civil protection order pursuant to article 14 of title 13 in actions brought
pursuant to article 3 of this title 19 or part 3 of article 7 of this title 19. The court shall use the standardized forms developed by the judicial department pursuant to section 13-1-136 and shall follow the standards and procedures
for the issuance of civil protection orders set forth in article 14 of title 13, including but not limited to personal service upon the restrained person. Once issued, the clerk of the issuing court shall enter the civil protection
order into the computerized central registry of protection orders created pursuant to section 18-6-803.7. If the person who is the subject of the civil protection order has not been personally served pursuant to section 13-14-107
(3), a peace officer responding to a call for assistance shall serve a copy of the civil protection order on the person who is subject to the order. If the civil protection order is made permanent pursuant to the provisions of
section 13-14-106, the civil protection order remains in effect upon termination of the juvenile court action. The clerk of the court issuing the order shall file a certified copy of the permanent civil protection order into an
existing case in the district court, if applicable, or with the county court in the county where the protected party resides. Civil protection orders issued by the district or the juvenile court pursuant to article 14 of title
13 have the same force and effect as protection orders issued pursuant to article 14 of title 13 by a court with concurrent jurisdiction.

Upon submission of a stipulated agreement of all parties, parents, guardians, and other legal custodians, if the juvenile court finds that it is in the best interests of the juvenile, the juvenile court may enter an order allocating parental responsibilities
and addressing parenting time and child support matters when:

The juvenile court has maintained jurisdiction in a case involving an adjudicated juvenile, a juvenile with a deferred adjudication, or a juvenile on a management plan developed pursuant to section 19-2.5-704 (3);

A child custody action, a dependency and neglect action, or an action for allocation of parental responsibilities concerning the same juvenile is not pending in a district court of this state, and the court complies, as applicable, with the requirements
of the "Uniform Child-custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act", as set forth in article 13 of title 14; and

All parties, parents, guardians, and other legal custodians involved are in agreement, or after notice is given to all parents, guardians, and other legal custodians and a response or objection is not filed.

The parent or person other than a parent with whom the juvenile resides the majority of the time pursuant to a juvenile court order shall file a certified copy of the order in the district court in the county where the juvenile is a permanent resident.
The district court shall treat the order as with any other decree issued in a proceeding concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 698, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 91:
(3)(b) amended, p. 360, § 24, effective April 9.

L. 92:
(3) amended, p. 173, § 1, effective April 16.

L. 97:
(6) added, p. 516, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 98:
(1)(a) amended, p. 820, § 21, effective August 5; (5) and (6) amended, p. 1405, § 61, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2001:
(1)(k) amended, p. 870, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2006:
(1)(i) amended, p. 1399, § 51, effective August 7.

L. 2008:
(1)(l) amended, p. 1891, § 59, effective August 5.

L. 2017:
(7) added, (HB 17-1111), ch. 96, p. 290, § 1, effective April 4; (1)(i) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1309, § 149, effective May 25; (5) amended and (8) added, (HB 17-1110), ch. 137, p. 458, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2019:
IP(1) and (1)(c) amended and (1.5) added, (HB 19-1042), ch. 55, p. 194, § 6, effective March 28.

L. 2020:
(1)(i) amended, (HB 20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1048, § 34, effective June 30.

L. 2021:
(1)(n) added and (7) amended, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2215, § 3, effective June 25; (1)(a), (5), and (8)(a)(I) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 725, § 60, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in § 19-1-104 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
(1) For the jurisdiction of the juvenile court of Denver, see § 13-8-103; for the exemption from criminal responsibility for insufficient age, see § 18-1-801.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

19-1-105. Right to counsel and jury trial.

All hearings, including adjudicatory hearings, shall be heard by a judge or magistrate without a jury, except as otherwise provided by this title.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until January 9, 2023.] The right to counsel shall be as provided in this title; except that, in all proceedings under the "School Attendance Law of 1963", article 33 of title 22, C.R.S., the
court may appoint counsel or a guardian ad litem for the child, unless the child is already represented by counsel. If the court finds that it is in the best interest and welfare of the child, the court may appoint both counsel
and a guardian ad litem. Nothing in this title shall prevent the court from appointing counsel if it deems representation by counsel necessary to protect the interests of the child or other parties. In addition, in all proceedings
under the "School Attendance Law of 1963", article 33 of title 22, C.R.S., the court shall make available to the child's parent or guardian ad litem information concerning the truancy process.

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
The right to counsel is provided in this title 19. Nothing in this title 19 prevents the court from appointing counsel in addition to a guardian ad litem for a child if it deems representation by counsel necessary
to protect the interests of the child.

[Editor's note: Subsection (3) is effective January 9, 2023.] In proceedings pursuant to the "School Attendance Law of 1963", article 33 of title 22, the court may appoint a guardian ad litem for the child, unless the child is already represented by counsel.
If the court finds that it is in the best interest and welfare of the child, the court may appoint both counsel and a guardian ad litem. The court shall make information regarding the truancy process available to the child's parent
or guardian ad litem.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 700, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 91:
(1) amended, p. 360, § 25, effective April 9.

L. 2003:
(2) amended, p. 1320, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2022:
(2) amended and (3) added, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 432, § 5, effective January 9, 2023.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-1-106 and 19-1-107 as said sections existed in 1986,
the year prior to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1038, see section 1 of chapter 92, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

19-1-106. Hearings - procedure - record.

The Colorado rules of juvenile procedure shall apply in all proceedings under this title.

Hearings may be conducted in an informal manner. The general public shall not be excluded unless the court determines that it is in the best interest of the child or of the community to exclude the general public, and, in such event, the court shall admit
only such persons as have an interest in the case or the work of the court, including persons whom the district attorney, the county or city attorney, the child, or the parents, guardian, or other custodian of the child wish to
be present.

A verbatim record shall be taken of all proceedings.

When more than one child is named in a petition alleging neglect or dependency, the hearings may be consolidated; except that separate hearings may be held with respect to disposition.

Children's cases shall be heard separately from adults' cases, and the child or his parents, guardian, or other custodian may be heard separately when deemed necessary by the court.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 700, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-1-107 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-1-107. Social study and other reports.

Unless waived by the court, an agency designated by the court shall make a social study and report in writing in all children's cases; except that:

Repealed.

Adoption reports shall be as provided in article 5 of this title.

For the purpose of determining proper disposition of a child, written reports and other material relating to the child's mental, physical, and social history may be received and considered by the court along with other evidence; but the court, if so requested
by the child, his parent or guardian, or other interested party, shall require that the person who wrote the report or prepared the material appear as a witness and be subject to both direct and cross-examination. In the absence
of such request, the court may order the person who prepared the report or other material to appear if it finds that the interest of the child so requires.

(2.5) For purposes of determining the appropriate treatment plan in connection with the disposition of a child who is under six years of age at the time a petition is filed in accordance with section 19-3-501 (2), the report shall include a list of services
available to families that are specific to the needs of the child and the child's family and that are available in the community where the family resides. The report shall establish a priority of the services if multiple services
are recommended. The services may include, but are not limited to, transportation services, visitation services, psychological counseling, drug screening and treatment programs, marriage and family counseling, parenting classes,
housing and day care assistance, and homemaker services.

In a case where placement out of the home is recommended, the social study required by subsection (1) of this section must include the cost of the recommended placement and an evaluation for placement containing the information required by section 19-1-115
(8)(e). The department of education and the department of human services shall jointly develop placement criteria, and, in the case of matters involving juvenile delinquency, the criteria must be in accordance with the criteria
for the placement of juveniles specified in section 19-2.5-1404. Such criteria must be used by the agency designated by the court to determine its recommendation about the need for placement.

The court shall inform the child, his parent or legal guardian, or other interested party of the right of cross-examination concerning any written report or other material as specified in subsection (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 701, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 93:
(3) amended, p. 1546, § 1, effective July 1; (3) amended, p. 1134, § 65, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:
(2.5) added, p. 2051, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 97:
(3) amended, p. 1441, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2005:
(3) amended, p. 766, § 29, effective June 1.

L. 2008:
(3) amended, p. 1891, § 60, effective August 5.

L. 2015:
IP(1) and (3) amended and (1)(a) repealed, (SB 15-099), ch. 99, p. 290, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2021:
(3) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 726, § 61, effective October 1.

19-1-108. Magistrates - qualifications - duties.

The juvenile court may appoint one or more magistrates to hear any case or matter under the court's jurisdiction, except where a jury trial has been requested pursuant to section 19-2.5-610 and in transfer hearings held pursuant to section 19-2.5-802.
Magistrates shall serve at the pleasure of the court, unless otherwise provided by law.

Every magistrate appointed pursuant to this section shall be licensed to practice law in Colorado; except that county judges who are not lawyers may be appointed to serve as magistrates, as authorized by section 13-6-105 (3), C.R.S., to hear detention
and bond matters.

Repealed.

Magistrates shall conduct hearings in the manner provided for the hearing of cases by the court. During the initial advisement of the rights of any party, the magistrate shall inform the party that, except as set forth in this subsection (3), the party
has the right to a hearing before the judge in the first instance and the party may waive that right but that, by waiving that right, the party is bound by the findings and recommendations of the magistrate, subject to
a request for review as set forth in subsection (5.5) of this section. The right to require a hearing before a judge does not apply to hearings at which a child is advised of his or her rights pursuant to section 19-2.5-605;
detention hearings held pursuant to sections 19-2.5-303, 19-2.5-304, and 19-2.5-305; preliminary hearings held pursuant to section 19-2.5-609; temporary custody hearings held pursuant to section 19-3-403; proceedings held
pursuant to article 4 of this title 19; and support proceedings held pursuant to article 6 of this title 19. In proceedings held pursuant to article 4 or 6 of this title 19, contested final orders regarding allocation of
parental responsibilities may be heard by the magistrate only with the consent of all parties.

In proceedings pursuant to article 2.5 of this title 19, the right to require a hearing before a judge is deemed waived unless a request is made by any party that the hearing be held before a judge at the time the matter is set for hearing.

In proceedings under article 3 of this title, the right to require a hearing before a judge is waived unless:

A request is made by a party or the people of the state of Colorado that the hearing be held before the judge at the time the matter is set for hearing, if counsel for the party is present at the time the matter is set; or

A request is made by a party or the people of the state of Colorado in writing within seven days after receipt of notice of the setting if the matter is set for hearing outside of the presence of counsel for a represented party or if the matter is set
on notice.

At the conclusion of a hearing, the magistrate shall:

Advise the parties before him of his findings and ruling;

Advise the parties of their right to review by the judge of his findings and ruling;

Prepare findings and a written order that shall become the order of the court, absent a petition for review being filed as provided in subsection (5.5) of this section; and

Advise the parties that they have a right to object to an order allowing the review of any decree for placement of a child to be conducted as an administrative review by the department of human services and that if any party objects to administrative
review, the court shall conduct the review.

Repealed.

(5.5) A request for review must be filed within fourteen days for proceedings under articles 2.5, 4, and 6 of this title or within seven days for proceedings under article 3 of this title after the parties have received notice of the magistrate's ruling
and must clearly set forth the grounds relied upon. Such review is solely upon the record of the hearing before the magistrate and is reviewable upon the grounds set forth in rule 59 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure.
A petition for review is a prerequisite before an appeal may be filed with the Colorado court of appeals or Colorado supreme court. The judge may, on his or her own motion, remand a case to another magistrate after action is
taken on a petition for review.

A magistrate may issue a lawful warrant taking a child into custody pursuant to section 19-2.5-204 and may issue search warrants as provided in sections 19-1-112 and 19-2.5-205.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 701, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 88:
(3) amended, p. 741, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 91:
Entire section amended, p. 361, § 26, effective April 9.

L. 92:
(4)(d) added, p. 221, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 94:
(4)(d) amended, p. 2658, § 145, effective July 1.

L. 97:
(3) and (5) amended, p. 517, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 99:
(1) and (6) amended, p. 1375, § 11, effective July 1; (5) amended, p. 1086, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2000:
(3)(c) amended, p. 35, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:
(3)(b) amended, p. 1901, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:
(3)(a) and (5) amended, p. 451, § 2, effective April 18; (3)(a.5) and (5.5) added, p. 452, §§ 3, 4, effective July 1, 2007.

L. 2007:
(3)(a.5) amended, p. 1652, § 9, effective May 31; (3)(a.5) amended, p. 2029, § 35, effective June 1; (4)(c) amended, p. 2029, § 36, effective July 1.

L. 2016:
IP(3)(c), (3)(c)(II), and (5.5) amended, (HB 16-1057), ch. 31, p. 70, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2019:
(3)(a.5) amended, (SB 19-108), ch. 294, p. 2727, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 2021:
(1), (3)(a.5), (3)(b), and (6) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 726, § 62, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(5.5) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2970, § 33, effective August 10.

19-1-109. Appeals - child welfare appeals workgroup - created - reports.

An appeal as provided in the introductory portion to section 13-4-102 (1), C.R.S., may be taken from any order, decree, or judgment. Appellate procedure shall be as provided by the Colorado appellate rules. Initials shall appear on the record on appeal
in place of the name of the child and respondents. Appeals shall be advanced on the calendar of the appellate court and shall be decided at the earliest practical time.

The people of the state of Colorado shall have the same right to appeal questions of law in delinquency cases as exists in criminal cases.

An order terminating or refusing to terminate the legal relationship between a parent or parents and one or more of the children of such parent or parents on a petition, or between a child and one or both parents of the child, shall be a final and appealable
order.

An order decreeing a child to be neglected or dependent shall be a final and appealable order after the entry of the disposition pursuant to section 19-3-508. Any appeal shall not affect the jurisdiction of the trial court to enter such further dispositional
orders as the court believes to be in the best interests of the child.

The child welfare appeals workgroup is established in the state judicial department and referred to in this subsection (3) as the "workgroup". The purpose of the workgroup is to consider necessary changes to practices, rules, and statutes to ensure that
appeals in cases concerning relinquishment, adoption, and dependency and neglect are resolved within six months after being filed.

Beginning January 1, 2022, the workgroup shall monitor, for two years, the implementation of the recommendations of the workgroup's 2021 final report, determine if other issues are contributing to appellate delay, study opportunities to reduce delay in
child welfare appeals, and provide training. No later than January 1, 2023, the judicial department shall report to the health and human services committee of the senate and the public and behavioral health and human services
committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, on the status of the workgroup's data collection; identified necessary resources; progress made on implementation of the recommendations; outstanding
recommendations; additional changes to practices, rules, and statutes necessary to ensure that appeals are resolved within six months of filing; and the impact those recommendations are having on appellate delay. No later
than July 1, 2024, the workgroup shall also issue a final report.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 702, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 97:
(2) amended and (3) added, p. 1433, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2000:
(3) amended, p. 1546, § 3, effective August 2.

L. 2022:
(3) amended, (HB 22-1113), ch. 56, p. 261, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-1-112 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1113, see section 1 of chapter 56, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

19-1-110. Previous orders and decrees - force and effect.

All orders and decrees in proceedings concerning dependency and neglect, delinquency, relinquishment, adoption, paternity, or contributing to dependency or delinquency entered by the court prior to October 1, 1987, shall remain in full force and effect
until modified or terminated by the court, as provided in this title.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 702, § 1, effective October 1; entire section amended, p. 1827, § 1, effective August 27.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-1-113 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-1-111. Appointment of guardian ad litem.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until January 9, 2023.] The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the child in all dependency or neglect cases under this title.

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for every child under twelve years of age in all dependency and neglect cases pursuant to this title 19.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem in the following cases:

For a child in a delinquency proceeding where:

No parent, guardian, legal custodian, custodian, person to whom parental responsibilities have been allocated, relative, stepparent, or spousal equivalent appears at the first or any subsequent hearing in the case;

The court finds that a conflict of interest exists between the child and parent, guardian, legal custodian, custodian, person to whom parental responsibilities have been allocated, relative, stepparent, or spousal equivalent; or

The court makes specific findings that the appointment of a guardian ad litem is necessary to serve the best interests of the child and such specific findings are included in the court's order of appointment.

For a child in proceedings under the "School Attendance Law of 1963", article 33 of title 22, C.R.S., when the court finds that the appointment is necessary due to exceptional and extraordinary circumstances;

For a parent, guardian, legal custodian, custodian, person to whom parental responsibilities have been allocated, stepparent, or spousal equivalent in dependency or neglect proceedings who has been determined to have a behavioral or mental health disorder
or an intellectual and developmental disability by a court of competent jurisdiction; except that, if a conservator has been appointed, the conservator shall serve as the guardian ad litem. If the conservator does not serve
as guardian ad litem, the conservator shall be informed that a guardian ad litem has been appointed.

For an underage party seeking a marriage license, as provided in section 14-2-108 (2).

[Editor's note: Subsection (2)(e) is effective January 9, 2023.] For a youth who is twelve years of age or older in a dependency and neglect case when the court determines a guardian ad litem is necessary due to the youth's diminished capacity. The court
shall not consider age or developmental maturity as the sole basis for a determination of diminished capacity. The court shall not deem a guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to this subsection (2)(e) to be a substitute
for a counsel for youth appointed pursuant to this section.

(2.5) A court shall not deem a guardian ad litem who is appointed by the court for a juvenile in a delinquency proceeding pursuant to subsection (2) of this section to be a substitute for defense counsel for the juvenile.

The guardian ad litem for the child shall have the right to participate in all proceedings as a party, except in delinquency cases.

Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection (4), the appointment of a guardian ad litem pursuant to this section shall continue until such time as the court's jurisdiction is terminated.

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (4)(b) is effective until January 9, 2023.] The appointment of the guardian ad litem shall terminate in a delinquency proceeding:

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (4)(b) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
The appointment of the guardian ad litem terminates in a delinquency proceeding:

At the time sentence is imposed, unless the court continues the appointment because the child is sentenced to residential or community out-of-home placement as a condition of probation; or

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(b)(II) is effective until January 9, 2023.] When the child reaches eighteen years of age, unless the child has a developmental disability.

(II)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(b)(II) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
When the child reaches eighteen years of age, unless the court continues the appointment because the court determines the appointment is necessary because of the youth's diminished capacity.

The court may terminate the appointment of a guardian ad litem in a delinquency proceeding on its own motion or on the motion of the guardian ad litem when the appointment is no longer necessary due to any of the following reasons:

The child's parent, guardian, legal custodian, custodian, person to whom parental responsibilities have been allocated, relative, stepparent, or spousal equivalent appears at a hearing in the case;

The conflict of interest described in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section no longer exists; or

The appointment no longer serves the best interests of the child.

The guardian ad litem shall cooperate with any CASA volunteer appointed pursuant to section 19-1-206.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (6) is effective until January 9, 2023.] Any person appointed to serve as a guardian ad litem pursuant to this section shall comply with the provisions set forth in any chief justice directive concerning the
court appointment of guardians ad litem and other representatives and of counsel for children and indigent persons in titles 14, 15, 19 (dependency and neglect only), 22, and 27, C.R.S., and any subsequent chief justice directive
or other practice standards established by rule or directive of the chief justice pursuant to section 13-91-105, C.R.S., concerning the duties or responsibilities of guardians ad litem in legal matters affecting children.

(6)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (6) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
Any person appointed to serve as a guardian ad litem pursuant to this section shall comply with any chief justice directive concerning the court appointment of guardians ad litem and other representatives and of
counsel for youth and indigent persons in titles 14, 15, 22, and 27 and this title 19, and any subsequent chief justice directive or other practice standards established by rule or directive of the chief justice pursuant to
section 13-91-105 concerning the duties or responsibilities of guardians ad litem in legal matters affecting children.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 702, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 92:
(1) amended, p. 221, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 96:
(5) added, p. 1089, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 98:
(2)(a)(I), (2)(a)(II), and (2)(c) amended, p. 1405, § 62, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2000:
(6) added, p. 1774, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2006:
(2)(c) amended, p. 1400, § 52, effective August 7.

L. 2009:
(2)(a)(III), (2)(b), and (4) amended, (SB 09-268), ch. 207, p. 942, § 3, effective May 1.

L. 2014:
(2.5) added, (HB 14-1032), ch. 247, p. 954, § 5, effective November 1.

L. 2015:
(6) amended, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 952, § 41, effective August 5.

L. 2017:
(2)(c) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1309, § 150, effective May 25.

L. 2019:
(2)(d) added, (HB 19-1316), ch. 380, p. 3422, § 6, effective August 2.

L. 2022:
(1), IP(4)(b), (4)(b)(II), and (6) amended and (2)(e) added, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 433, § 6, effective January 9, 2023.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-3-105 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1038, see section 1 of chapter 92, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

19-1-111.5. Court-appointed special advocate.

The court may appoint a CASA volunteer pursuant to the provisions of part 2 of this article if the court finds that the appointment would be in the best interests of the child. The court may direct the manner in which a CASA volunteer and any guardian
ad litem appointed in a case shall collaborate.

Source:

L. 96:
Entire section added, p. 1089, § 3, effective May 23.

19-1-112. Search warrants for the protection of children.

A search warrant may be issued by the juvenile court to search any place for the recovery of any child within the jurisdiction of the court believed to be a delinquent child or a neglected or dependent child.

Such warrant shall be issued only on the conditions that the application for the warrant shall:

Be in writing and supported by affidavit sworn to or affirmed before the court;

Name or describe with particularity the child sought;

State that the child is believed to be a delinquent child or a neglected or dependent child and the reasons upon which such belief is based;

State the address or legal description of the place to be searched;

State the reasons why it is necessary to proceed pursuant to this section.

If the court is satisfied that grounds for the application exist or that there is probable cause to believe that they exist, it shall issue a search warrant identifying by name or describing with particularity the child sought and the place to be searched
for the child.

The search warrant shall be directed to any officer authorized by law to execute it in the county wherein the place to be searched is located.

The warrant shall state the grounds or probable cause for its issuance and the names of the persons whose affidavits have been taken in support thereof.

The warrant shall be served in the daytime unless the application for the warrant alleges that it is necessary to conduct the search at some other time, in which case the court may so direct.

A copy of the warrant, the application therefor, and the supporting affidavit shall be served upon the person in possession of the place to be searched and where the child is to be sought.

If the child is found, the child may be taken into custody pursuant to section 19-2.5-209 or 19-3-401.

The warrant shall be returned to the issuing court.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 703, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2021:
(8) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 727, § 63, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-2-104 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.